Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-603.03
Cancel, defined.

Cancel shall mean to discontinue all rights and privileges to hold a license for up to three years.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 49;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 9-603.01;

Laws 2003, LB 3, § 5.